Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Safety Provisions

234.100.
Definitions for KRS 234.100 to 234.160 and 234.990.

As used in KRS

234.100

to

234.160

and

234.990

the term “liquefied petroleum gas” means and includes any material which is composed predominantly of any of the following hydrocarbons, or mixtures of them, whether in the liquid or in the gaseous states: propane, propylene, butane (normal butane or isobutane), and butylene.

“Commissioner” means commissioner of housing, buildings and construction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 25, § 1; 1960, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 20; 1978, ch. 117, § 25, effective July 1, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 495, effective July 15, 2010.

234.110.
Approval of containers required. [Repealed.]

234.120.
License and minimum liability insurance requirements — Fees — More than one place of business — Proof of financial responsibility — License suspension or revocation.

Subject to the exceptions provided in subsection (2), no person shall engage in any of the businesses set out in this subsection without first having provided proof to the commissioner of ability to respond in damages for personal injury and property damages in the amount prescribed, and having obtained from the commissioner the required license or licenses and paid the prescribed fee therefor:

Selling or delivering to the ultimate consumer or user of liquefied petroleum gas; selling liquefied petroleum gas regulating equipment; repairing, installing, or connecting of containers, liquefied petroleum gas appliances, or liquefied petroleum gas utilization equipment; or filling of D.O.T. liquefied petroleum gas containers for ultimate consumer or wholesale dealer. In-state liquefied petroleum gas dealers, except those holding a valid license on July 15, 1994, shall maintain a liquefied petroleum gas storage facility with an eighteen thousand (18,000) gallon minimum capacity within the boundaries of Kentucky. Out-of-state liquefied petroleum gas dealers, except those holding a valid license on July 15, 1994, shall maintain an eighteen thousand (18,000) gallon minimum capacity liquefied petroleum gas storage facility within fifty (50) miles of the Kentucky border. Until January 1, 2002, the fee for this license shall be one hundred dollars ($100). Beginning on January 1, 2002, the fee for this license shall be two hundred dollars ($200), and the license shall be issued for a period of two (2) years. The minimum liability insurance for this license shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000).

Selling or delivering liquefied petroleum gas in prefilled or filled-on-site containers of one hundred (100) pound liquefied petroleum gas capacity or less; selling of liquefied petroleum gas regulating equipment; assembly, repairing, installing, or connecting of liquefied petroleum gas containers, liquefied petroleum gas appliances, or any liquefied petroleum gas utilization equipment. Until January 1, 2002, the fee for this license shall be fifty dollars ($50). Beginning on January 1, 2002, the fee for this license shall be one hundred dollars ($100), and the license shall be issued for a period of two (2) years. The minimum liability insurance for this license shall be five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

Selling or filling of D.O.T. liquefied petroleum gas containers of forty-five (45) pounds or less capacity, or selling liquefied petroleum gas at a specific site for use as a motor vehicle fuel. Until January 1, 2002, the fee for this license shall be fifty dollars ($50). Beginning on January 1, 2002, the fee for this license shall be one hundred dollars ($100), and the license shall be issued for a period of two (2) years. The minimum liability insurance for this license shall be five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

Storing, for resale, liquefied petroleum gas in D.O.T. containers of forty-five (45) pounds or less capacity, or selling D.O.T. containers, storage cabinets, racks, docks, for storage of forty-five (45) pound capacity or less. Until January 1, 2001, the fee for this license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). Beginning on January 1, 2001, the fee for this license shall be fifty dollars ($50), and the license shall be issued for a period of two (2) years. The minimum liability insurance for this license shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

Assembling, repairing, installing, or connecting of liquefied petroleum gas containers, or regulating equipment, or liquefied petroleum gas appliances, or any liquefied petroleum gas utilization equipment. Until January 1, 2001, the fee for this license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). Beginning on January 1, 2001, the fee for this license shall be fifty dollars ($50), and the license shall be issued for a period of two (2) years. The minimum liability insurance for this license shall be five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

Any person engaged in any business for which a license is required under the provisions of subsection (1) and who engages in the business at more than one (1) office or place of business in this state shall obtain a separate license for each such office or place of business and shall pay therefor the required license fee; except that for the purposes of issuance of licenses under subsection (1) all facilities for the storage only of liquefied petroleum gas for resale within a radius of twenty (20) miles of an office or place of business shall be considered a part of the office or place of business and shall not require separate licensure.

The commissioner shall further have the authority to promulgate and enforce reasonable administrative regulations requiring proof of ability to respond in damages for personal injury and property damages in the minimum amounts required under the provisions of subsection (1), prior to the issuance of a license. The commissioner shall also have authority to suspend or revoke any license issued under this section for willful or gross negligence or for violation of any applicable administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

227.300

, but any licensee whose license is suspended or revoked shall be afforded the opportunity for an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 25, § 3; 1960, ch. 138, § 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1994, ch. 153, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 153, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 153, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 496, effective July 15, 2010.

234.130.
Issuance, expiration, and renewal of licenses.

The initial license required under KRS

234.120

shall be issued by the department and shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month in the next even-numbered year. The department may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial licenses issued for less than twenty-four (24) months. Renewed licenses shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month of each numbered year after the issuance of the renewed license. Renewal fees shall be the same as the initial license fee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 25, § 4; 1960, ch. 138, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 2000, ch. 153, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 182, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 497, effective July 15, 2010.

234.140.
Regulations.

The commissioner, after a public hearing thereon, shall make, promulgate, and enforce regulations setting forth minimum general standards covering the design, construction, location, installation, and operation of equipment for storing, handling, transporting by tank truck, tank trailer, and utilizing liquefied petroleum gases, and specifying the odorization of said gases and the degree thereof. Said regulations shall be such as are reasonably necessary for the protection of the health, welfare and safety of the public and persons using such materials, and shall be in substantial conformity with the generally accepted standards of safety concerning the same subject matter. Regulations concerning the construction of buildings relating to liquefied petroleum gases shall conform to the uniform state building code after said code is promulgated.

The commissioner shall promulgate any additional rules and regulations which he or she deems necessary to provide for the safe storage, handling, transportation and use of liquefied petroleum gas.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 25, § 5; 1960, ch. 138, § 5, effective June 16, 1960; 1966, ch. 30, § 3; 1978, ch. 117, § 26, effective July 1, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 498, effective July 15, 2010.

234.150.
Standards of National Fire Protection Association authorized.

It is hereby declared that regulations in substantial conformity with the published standards of the National Fire Protection Association for the design, installation and construction of containers and pertinent equipment for the storage and handling of liquefied petroleum gases as recommended by the National Fire Protection Association shall be deemed to be in substantial conformity with the general accepted standards of safety concerning the same subject matter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 25, § 6; 1966, ch. 30, § 1.

234.160.
Deposit and disposition of fees.

All moneys collected under the provisions of KRS

234.100

to

234.160

shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund to be used by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction solely for the administration and enforcement of KRS

234.100

to

234.160

and

234.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 25, § 7; 1960, ch. 138, § 11, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 20; 1978, ch. 117, § 27, effective July 1, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 499, effective July 15, 2010.

234.165.
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Bureau. [Repealed.]

234.170.
Advisory council. [Repealed.]

234.171.
Advisory board — Membership — Functions.

The commissioner of housing, buildings and construction may appoint an advisory board composed of persons actively engaged in the liquefied petroleum gas industry in the State of Kentucky. The board shall give the commissioner the benefit of its technical knowledge to aid him or her in supervising and regulating the liquefied petroleum gas industry.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 30, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 20; 1978, ch. 117, § 28, effective July 1, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 500, effective July 15, 2010.

234.175.
Certification of equipment installation — Compliance with administrative regulations and manufacturer’s instructions — Immunity from liability — Exception.

Domestic and commercial gas-consuming equipment and appliances shall not be installed unless their correctness as to design, construction, and performance is certified by:

A nationally recognized testing agency adequately equipped and competent to perform such services evidenced by the attachment of its seal or label to such gas appliances. This agency shall be one which maintains a program of national inspection of production models of gas appliances, at least once each year on the manufacturer’s premises;

By the American Gas Association Laboratories, as evidenced by the attachment of its listing symbol or approval seal to gas appliances and a certificate or letter certifying approval under the above-mentioned requirements, or listing by Underwriters’ Laboratories, Inc., shall be considered as constituting compliance with the provisions of this section, providing, that the manufacturer has approval and certification of same from the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

Equipment not subject to A.G.A. or laboratory inspection must have approval of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

A person shall not install gas-consuming appliances, equipment, or other components of a gas delivery system unless the installation is made in accordance with the instructions of the manufacturer of the appliance, equipment, or component and in compliance with the applicable administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

A person shall not alter, modify, maintain, or repair gas-consuming appliances, equipment, or other components of a gas delivery system unless the alteration, modification, maintenance, or repair is made in accordance with the instructions of the manufacturer of the appliance, equipment, or component and in compliance with the applicable administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

A person licensed under this chapter or an agent or employee of the person shall not be liable for civil damages for injury to persons or property that result from the installation, alteration, modification, maintenance, or repair of a gas-consuming appliance, equipment, or component by a person other than the licensee or the licensee’s agent or employee.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person licensed under this chapter or the licensee’s agent or employee who provides gas to an end user shall not be liable for civil damages for injury to persons or property that result from the installation, alteration, modification, maintenance, or repair of the gas-consuming appliance, equipment, or component if the installation, alteration, modification, maintenance, or repair is done without the actual knowledge and consent of the licensee or the licensee’s agent or employee.

A person licensed under this chapter or his or her agent or employee shall not be exempt from liability for civil damages under paragraph (a) of this subsection if the person or his or her agent or employee is negligent or acts intentionally, and the negligence or intentional act causes or partially causes injury or damage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 138, § 8, effective June 16, 1960; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 20; 1978, ch. 117, § 29, effective July 1, 1978; 2005, ch. 148, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 501, effective July 15, 2010.

234.180.
Plans for storage plants — Submission — Approval — Contents.

For plants storing liquefied petroleum gases, and used for the dispensing of liquefied petroleum gases in liquid state into container or containers, for resale, plans shall be submitted, in duplicate, to the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction, and shall be approved by the department before construction is started. Plans so submitted shall show the following information as a minimum:

The name and address of the owner, and the name and purpose of the plant proposed;

Location of the proposed plant in relation to the nearest city, highways, railroads, and built up areas;

A plot plan showing dimensions of the area proposed to be used for the plant, distances to the nearest property lines and the location and construction of any buildings which might affect the distances required under regulations adopted by the commissioner of housing, buildings, and construction;

Construction drawings showing the arrangement and construction of all tanks, tank supports, piping, accessories, buildings, and appurtenant items of construction. These drawings shall be in sufficient detail to allow a contractor who is familiar with tank and pipe installation but not necessarily familiar with liquefied petroleum gas installations to use such drawings to satisfactorily complete the installation without further instructions;

A copy of the original boiler inspector’s report of inspection of the tank or tanks to be used or a reference to manufacturer’s name and serial number of the tank so that the report may be obtained direct;

The date of completion of the plans, the dates of any subsequent revisions and the signature of the person assuming responsibility for the correctness of the plans.

For plants, installed for industrial or commercial usage, having a nominal water capacity of 150 gallons or over and serving an aggregate BTU usage of 150,000 BTUs or over and/or used for dispensing liquefied petroleum gas into other containers, not for resale, a report of installation, giving location and equipment installed, must be made to the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction, not later than ten (10) days after installation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 138, § 9, effective June 16, 1960; Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 20; 1978, ch. 117, § 30, effective July 1, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 502, effective July 15, 2010.

234.185.
Employe’s permit; examination; renewal. [Repealed.]

234.190.
Use of or work upon liquefied petroleum gas container without consent of owner prohibited — Removal or replacement request.

No person shall sell, install, fill, refill, deliver or permit to be delivered, or use in any manner any liquefied petroleum gas container unless the container is owned by the person or its use is authorized by its owner.

No person shall dismantle, evacuate, service, relocate, make or break any connections to, or deface any liquefied petroleum gas container or its regulatory equipment unless the container or its connection are owned by the person or the action is authorized by the owner of the container.

The owner of a liquefied petroleum gas container shall remove or authorize replacement of the container within forty-eight (48) hours of receipt of a request for removal or replacement from the customer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 194, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

234.200.
Definitions for KRS 234.200 to 234.260.

As used in KRS

234.200

to

234.260

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Flash point” means the minimum temperature, in degrees Fahrenheit, at which a flammable liquid will give off flammable vapors as determined by test procedure and apparatus specified in the “Standard Method of Test for Flash Point by Means of the Tag Closed Tester” (A.S.T.M. D 56-52) published by the American Society for Testing Materials;

“Class A liquid” means any flammable liquid which has a flash point of one hundred degrees (100°) Fahrenheit, or less;

“Class B liquid” means any flammable liquid which has a flash point above one hundred degrees (100°) Fahrenheit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 1, effective June 17, 1954.

234.210.
Sales of certain liquids prohibited.

No person shall have for sale, sell, give or deliver to another any product known, advertised, sold or offered for sale as kerosene, coal oil, fuel oil, stove oil, range oil, furnace oil, distillate or diesel fuel, or by a trade name commonly identified with any such product, unless the product constitutes a Class B liquid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 2, effective June 17, 1954.

234.220.
Label required on container or apparatus from which sale is made.

No dealer shall sell or deliver kerosene, coal oil, fuel oil, stove oil, range oil, furnace oil or other Class B liquid except from a container having the name of the liquid sold plainly marked or labeled on the container, or on the pump or delivery equipment serving such container.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 3, effective June 17, 1954.

234.230.
Class A liquid to be purged from tank and piping before use with Class B liquid.

No compartment of a tank vehicle which has contained a Class A liquid on the prior loading shall be loaded with Class B liquid until such compartment and all piping and accessory delivery equipment connected thereto have been drained of all Class A liquid and then flushed with a quantity of Class B liquid sufficient to clear them of any remaining Class A liquid; or cleared of Class A liquid by some equally effective method.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 4, effective June 17, 1954.

234.240.
Class A liquid to be purged from pumps, meters and hoses before use with Class B liquid.

In the event that a tank vehicle is equipped with a pump, meter, and hose, or any combination thereof, such equipment shall not be used for the delivery of Class B liquid if its prior use has been for Class A liquid, unless it has first been flushed with a quantity of Class B liquid sufficient to effectively clear it of all Class A liquid; or cleared of Class A liquid by some equally effective method.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 5, effective June 17, 1954.

234.250.
Prohibited use of tanks having common outlet on manifold.

In the event that compartments of a tank vehicle are connected to a common outlet or manifold, no compartment so connected shall contain Class A liquids while any other compartment so connected contains Class B liquids.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 6, effective June 17, 1954.

234.260.
When separate delivery equipment required for Class A and Class B liquids.

No manifold, pump, meter, or hose shall be used for the delivery of Class A and Class B liquids on the same trip. Flushing, as provided in KRS

234.240

, shall not be done during the course of deliveries. If the use of a manifold, pump, meter, or hose is required for the delivery of Class A and Class B liquids on the same trip, then separate delivery equipment shall be provided. Such equipment shall be tagged or painted to clearly indicate the class of liquid for which it is used.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 208, § 7.